Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.030

Petitions—Place of filing—Consolidation of petitions and hearings.

(1) A petition under this chapter may be filed in the superior court of the county in which the petitioner is a resident or of the county in which the adoptee is domiciled.

(2) A petition under this chapter may be consolidated with any other petition under this chapter. A hearing under this chapter may be consolidated with any other hearing under this chapter.

[ 1984 c 155 s 3.]